test/src/morphology/verb-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/verb.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  V: #
    kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kutoo # 
    kutoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: kudotaan # 
    tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tietää # 
    tietää+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg2: tiesit # 
    nähdä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähnyt # 
    juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juossut # 
